Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 5. RAILROADS

SUBTITLE Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 192. ENGINEER'S OPERATOR PERMIT AND TRAIN OPERATOR PERMIT

Sec. 192.001. ISSUANCE OF PERMIT. (a) A railroad company shall issue an engineer's operator permit to each person whom the company employs to operate or permits to operate a railroad locomotive in this state.

(b) A railroad company shall issue a train operator permit to each person:

(1) whom the company employs to operate or permits to operate a train in this state; and

(2) who has not been issued an engineer's operator permit.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 192.002. PERMIT REQUIRED. (a) A person operating a railroad locomotive in this state shall have in the person's immediate possession an engineer's operator permit issued under this chapter.

(b) A person operating a train in this state, other than a person issued a permit under Section 192.001(a), shall have in the person's immediate possession a train operator permit issued under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 192.003. FORM OF PERMIT. A permit issued under this chapter must include the permit holder's name, address, physical description, photograph, and date of birth.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 192.004. PROOF OF IDENTIFICATION. If a peace officer requires a person to show proof of identification in connection with the person's operation of a railroad locomotive or train, the person:

(1) shall display the person's permit issued under this chapter; and

(2) may not be required to display a driver's license issued under Chapter 521 or commercial driver's license issued under Chapter 522.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 192.005. RECORD OF COLLISION OR VIOLATION. If a person operating a railroad locomotive or train is involved in a collision with another train or a motor vehicle or is arrested for violation of a law relating to the person's operation of a railroad locomotive or train:

(1) the number of or other identifying information on the person's driver's license or commercial driver's license may not be included in any report of the collision or violation; and

(2) the person's involvement in the collision or violation may not be recorded in the person's individual driving record maintained by the Department of Public Safety.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 24.101, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.